Hawaii statutes.
§606-13 Salary and perquisites of official
court reporters. Each official court reporter shall receive for
services as prescribed in section 606-12 the salary that may be appropriated
from time to time as compensation for the official court reporter's services in
court. Each official court reporter may charge and collect fees for
transcripts requested by the parties, including state courts, pursuant to rules
promulgated by the supreme court through its rulemaking authority. The fees
for transcripts ordered by a party shall be paid by the party ordering the same
and, except in the case of the attorney general, the public defender, or the
county or prosecuting attorneys or corporation counsels, no official court
reporter shall be required to perform any such service until the fees have been
paid or the amount of the estimated cost of the fees deposited with the clerk
of the court.

Where the court, of its own motion, orders a
transcript to be prepared of the whole or any part of the testimony in a civil
cause, it may, in its discretion, direct the payment of the charges therefor,
and the taxation of the same as costs, in such manner as to it may seem just.
Where the attorney general, the public defender, or the county or prosecuting
attorney or corporation counsel, desires transcripts for official use, either
original or copy, the official court reporter may be paid for same by warrant
upon the treasury of the State or county, as the case may be.

Official court reporters or other persons
preparing transcripts shall provide, at their own expense, all supplies
directly related to the preparation thereof. [L 1915, c 88, §3; RL 1925, §2301;
RL 1935, §3700; am L 1941, c 29, §1; RL 1945, §9733; am L 1949, c 361, §1; RL
1955, §218-13; am L 1963, c 89, §1; HRS §606-13; am L 1969, c 184, §1; am L
1972, c 88, §4(k), (l); am L 1975, c 100, §1; am L 1981, c 63, §1; am L 1983, c
73, §1; am L 1996, c 226, §3]

Rules of Court

Order for transcript of evidence, see RDC rule 25;
transcripts, rates, see RCR rule 19.

Recording of testimony and proceedings, see RCC rule 25.1;
RDC rule 25.1.

Case Notes

Appellee was entitled to recover cost of one copy of
transcripts in amount authorized by this section. 79 H. 291, 901 P.2d 1270
(1995).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next